Vermont, session 2025-2026, S168.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2501 is amended to read:
§ 2501. GRAND LARCENY
(a) A person who steals from the actual or constructive possession of
another, other than from his or her person, money, goods, chattels, bank notes,
bonds, promissory notes, bills of exchange or other bills, orders, or certificates,
or a book of accounts for or concerning money, or goods due or to become due
or to be delivered, or a deed or writing containing a conveyance of land, or any
other valuable contract in force, or a receipt, release or defeasance, writ,
process, or public record, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined
VT LEG #385824 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.168
2026 Page 2 of 4
not more than $5,000.00, or both, if the money or other property stolen exceeds
$900.00 in value.
(b) It shall be a violation of subsection (a) of this section if:
(1) a person acts in concert with one or more persons on one or more
occasions within a period of 180 days to commit the offense of petit larceny in
violation of section 2502 of this title; and
(2) the aggregate value of the money or other property stolen exceeds
$900.00.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. chapter 57, subchapter 4, is amended to read:
Subchapter 4. Shoplifting
* * *
§ 2575. OFFENSE OF RETAIL THEFT
A person commits the offense of retail theft when the person, with intent of
depriving a merchant wrongfully of the lawful possession of merchandise,
money, or credit:
(1) takes and carries away or causes to be taken and carried away or aids
and abets the carrying away of any merchandise from a retail mercantile
establishment without paying the retail value of the merchandise; or
* * *
VT LEG #385824 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.168
2026 Page 3 of 4
§ 2577. PENALTY
(a) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise having
a retail value not in excess of $250.00 shall be punished by a fine of not more
than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.
(b) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise having
a retail value in excess of $250.00 and not in excess of $900.00 shall:
(1) for a first offense, be punished by a fine of not more than $500.00 or
imprisonment for not more than six months, or both;
(2) for a second offense, be punished by a fine of not more than
$1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than two years, if the second offense
occurs not more than two years after the first offense;
(3) for a third offense, be punished by a fine of not more than $1,500.00
or imprisonment for not more than three years, or both, if the third offense
occurs not more than two years after the second offense; or
(4) for a fourth or subsequent offense, be punished by a fine of not more
than $2,500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or both, if the
fourth or subsequent offense occurs not more than two years after the
immediately preceding offense.
(c)(1) A person convicted of the offense of retail theft of merchandise
having a retail value in excess of $900.00 shall be punished by a fine of not
more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or both.
VT LEG #385824 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.168
2026 Page 4 of 4
(2) A person shall be punished pursuant to this subsection if:
(A) the person acts in concert with one or more persons on one or
more occasions within a period of 180 days to commit the offense of retail
theft in violation of subdivision 2575(1) of this title; and
(B) the aggregate value of the merchandise taken away exceeds
$900.00.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385824 v.1